Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,114
License or registration; required, when.

Any agent, employee, or representative of an investment advisor acting on behalf of a local government investment pool who solicits, purchases, or sells securities or eligible investments on behalf of the local government investment pool shall hold and maintain any license or registration required by federal or state law to solicit, purchase, or sell securities or eligible investments on behalf of a local government investment pool.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 36.